Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2381SV (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 518 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0t. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 280.36 relating to placing certain 4 specified employees on administrative leave in the same manner 5 as a school district. 6 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 9 requirements of section 280.36 relating to placing certain 10 specified employees on administrative leave in the same manner 11 as a school district. 12 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 280.36 Administrative leave. 13 1. The board of directors of each school district and the 14 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school shall 15 immediately place an employee on administrative leave if any 16 of the following apply: 17 a. The employee has a case pending before the board of 18 educational examiners related to the abuse of a child with a 19 finding of probable cause. 20 b. While employed by the school district or accredited 21 nonpublic school, the employee was involved in any criminal 22 or civil action in which a court found that the employee was 23 negligent, and the school district or accredited nonpublic 24 school is investigating the employeeâs actions. 25 2. An employee placed on administrative leave pursuant to 26 subsection 1 must remain on administrative leave until the 27 case before the board of educational examiners or the school 28 districtâs or accredited nonpublic schoolâs investigation is 29 complete. 30